trunk/resultats/catalan_i.aff
flag *M:    # Verbs en -ir, formes comunes als grups III, IV i V
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IM              # 4. patim       <IPR>
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IM              # seguim
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏM              # induïm
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏM              # traïm
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IU              # 5. patiu
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IU              # seguiu
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏU              # induïu
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏU              # traïu
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IA              # 1. patia       <IIM>
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IA              # seguia
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏA              # induïa
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏA              # traïa
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IES             # 2. paties
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IES             # seguies
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏES             # induïes
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏES             # traïes
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IA              # 3. patia
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IA              # seguia
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏA              # induïa
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏA              # traïa
    I R É                > -IRÉ,ÍEM             # 4. patíem, traíem
    I R É                > -IRÉ,ÍEU             # 5. patíeu, traíeu
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IEN             # 6. patien
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IEN             # seguien
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏEN             # induïen
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏEN             # traïen
    I R É                > -IRÉ,Í               # 1. patí        <IPE>
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IRES            # 2. patires
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IRES            # seguires
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏRES            # induïres
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏRES            # traïres
    I R É                > -IRÉ,Í               # 3. patí
    I R É                > -IRÉ,ÍREM            # 4. patírem, traírem
    I R É                > -IRÉ,ÍREU            # 5. patíreu, traíreu
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IREN            # 6. patiren
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IREN            # seguiren
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏREN            # induïren
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏREN            # traïren
    I R É                > -IRÉ,IRÉ             # 1. patiré, trairé <FUT>
    I R É                > -IRÉ,IRÀS            # 2. patiràs, trairàs
    I R É                > -IRÉ,IRÀ             # 3. patirà, trairà
    I R É                > -IRÉ,IREM            # 4. patirem, trairem
    I R É                > -IRÉ,IREU            # 5. patireu, traireu
    I R É                > -IRÉ,IRAN            # 6. patiran, trairan
    I R É                > -IRÉ,IRIA            # 1. patiria, trairia <CON>
    I R É                > -IRÉ,IRIES           # 2. patiries, trairies
    I R É                > -IRÉ,IRIA            # 3. patiria, trairia
    I R É                > -IRÉ,IRÍEM           # 4. patiríem, trairíem
    I R É                > -IRÉ,IRÍEU           # 5. patiríeu, trairíeu
    I R É                > -IRÉ,IRIEN           # 6. patirien, trairien
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IM              # 4. patim       <SPR>
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IM              # seguim
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏM              # induïm
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏM              # traïm
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IU              # 5. patiu
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IU              # seguiu
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏU              # induïu
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏU              # traïu
    I R É                > -IRÉ,ÍS              # 1. patís       <SIM>
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IRA             # patira
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IRA             # seguira
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏRA             # induïra
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏRA             # traïra
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,ISSIS           # 2. patissis
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,ISSIS           # seguissis
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏSSIS           # induïssis
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏSSIS           # traïssis
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,ISSES           # patisses
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,ISSES           # seguisses
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏSSES           # induïsses
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏSSES           # traïsses
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IRES            # patires
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IRES            # seguires
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏRES            # induïres
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏRES            # traïres
    I R É                > -IRÉ,ÍS              # 3. patís
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IRA             # patira
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IRA             # seguira
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏRA             # induïra
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏRA             # traïra
    I R É                > -IRÉ,ÍSSIM           # 4. patíssim
    I R É                > -IRÉ,ÍSSEM           # patíssem
    I R É                > -IRÉ,ÍREM            # patírem
    I R É                > -IRÉ,ÍSSIU           # 5. patíssiu
    I R É                > -IRÉ,ÍSSEU           # patísseu
    I R É                > -IRÉ,ÍREU            # patíreu
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,ISSIN           # 6. patissin
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,ISSIN           # seguissin
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏSSIN           # induïssin
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏSSIN           # traïssin
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,ISSEN           # patissen
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,ISSEN           # seguissen
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏSSEN           # induïssen
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏSSEN           # traïssen
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IREN            # patiren
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IREN            # seguiren
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏREN            # induïren
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏREN            # traïren
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IM              # 4. patim       <IMP>
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IM              # seguim
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏM              # induïm
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏM              # traïm
    [^AEIOU] I R É       > -IRÉ,IU              # 5. patiu
    [GQ] U I R É         > -IRÉ,IU              # seguiu
    [^GQ] U I R É        > -IRÉ,ÏU              # induïu
    [AEIO] I R É         > -IRÉ,ÏU              # traïu
