trunk/resultats/catalan_i.dic
abaratiré/MNZ
abastiré/MNZ
abelliré/MNZ
ablaniré/MNZ
aboliré/MNZ
aboniré/MNZ
abrasiré/MNZ
abscindiré/MNZ
absorbiré/MNZ
abstergiré/MNZ
aclameiré/MNZ
acolliré/MZ
acoloriré/MNZ
aconseguiré/MNZ
acudiré/MNZ
adheriré/MNZ
adiré/MNZ
adoloriré/MNZ
adquiriré/MNZ
afavoriré/MNZ
afegiré/MNZ
afligiré/MNZ
afranquiré/MNZ
agarbiré/MNZ
agrairé/MNZ
agriré/MNZ
aigualiré/MNZ
alentiré/MNZ
al·ludiré/MNZ
amaniré/MNZ
amarriré/MNZ
amolliré/MNZ
amorroniré/MNZ
antecediré/MNZ
aplaudiré/MNZ
argüiré/MNZ
arrauliré/MNZ
arrupiré/MNZ
aspergiré/MNZ
assentiré/MNZ
asserviré/MNZ
assoliré/MNZ
assuaviré/MNZ
atapeiré/MNZ
aterriré/MNZ
atordiré/MNZ
atribuiré/MNZ
autocompadiré/MNZ
avergonyiré/MNZ
avorriré/MNZ
baliré/MN
barbulliré/M
bastiré/MN
bipartiré/MN
boniré/MN
botiré/MN
brogiré/MN
brunyiré/MN
brusiré/MN
bulliré/M
candiré/MN
capiré/MN
cediré/MN
circuiré/MN
cobriré/MN
coexistiré/MN
coincidiré/MN
colpiré/MN
col·lidiré/MN
compadiré/MN
compatiré/MN
competiré/MN
comprimiré/MN
comuniré/MN
concerniré/MN
condiré/MN
condormiré/M
confegiré/MN
confluiré/MN
conqueriré/MN
consistiré/MN
construiré/MN
contendiré/MN
controvertiré/MN
convertiré/MN
corferiré/MN
corroiré/MN
cruixiré/M
custodiré/MN
decatiré/MN
deduiré/MN
deferiré/MN
deflectiré/MN
deixondiré/MN
deliré/MN
departiré/MN
deprimiré/MN
derruiré/MN
desaconduiré/MN
desafavoriré/MN
desatapeiré/MN
descendiré/MN
descobriré/MN
descompartiré/MN
desconfiré/MN
desembalbiré/MN
desembraviré/MN
desemmelangiré/MN
desemperesiré/MN
desempudeiré/MN
desencariré/MN
desendolciré/MN
desenfadeiré/MN
desenganduliré/MN
desengorroniré/MN
desengruixiré/MN
desenllaminiré/MN
desenlletgiré/MN
desensopiré/MN
desentenebriré/MN
desentossudiré/MN
desentumiré/MN
desfavoriré/MN
desfrunziré/MN
desinhibiré/MN
desjunyiré/MN
desmentiré/MN
desobeiré/MN
desoiré/MN
desordiré/MN
desposseiré/MN
dessaboriré/MN
desteixiré/MN
destituiré/MN
desuniré/MN
desvestiré/MN
devaniré/MN
difluiré/MN
diluiré/MN
dirigiré/MN
discerniré/MN
disminuiré/MN
dissentiré/MN
distingiré/MN
divergiré/MN
dividiré/MN
eduiré/MNZ
eixarreiré/MNZ
eixorbiré/MNZ
elegiré/MNZ
eludiré/MNZ
embadaliré/MNZ
embalbiré/MNZ
embastardiré/MNZ
emblanquiré/MNZ
embogiré/MNZ
embordeiré/MNZ
embotiré/MNZ
embretoliré/MNZ
embrutiré/MNZ
emmagriré/MNZ
emmaleiré/MNZ
emmandriré/MNZ
emmarciré/MNZ
emmoreniré/MNZ
emmusteiré/MNZ
empal·lidiré/MNZ
empegueiré/MNZ
emperesosiré/MNZ
empobriré/MNZ
empoquiré/MNZ
empudentiré/MNZ
enaltiré/MNZ
enaspriré/MNZ
encalbiré/MNZ
encalliré/MNZ
encariré/MNZ
encobeiré/MNZ
encoixiré/MNZ
encondoliré/MNZ
encrueliré/MNZ
endarreriré/MNZ
endolciré/MNZ
endropiré/MNZ
enfadeiré/MNZ
enfelloniré/MNZ
enferestiré/MNZ
enferotgiré/MNZ
enfolliré/MNZ
enforfoguiré/MNZ
enfosquiré/MNZ
enfredoriré/MNZ
engallardiré/MNZ
engallofiré/MNZ
enganduliré/MNZ
engelabriré/MNZ
englotiré/MNZ
engolosiré/MNZ
engormandiré/MNZ
engrandiré/MNZ
engroguiré/MNZ
engrunyoniré/MNZ
enjoveniré/MNZ
enllangoriré/MNZ
enllepoliré/MNZ
enlletgiré/MNZ
enlluiré/MNZ
ennobliré/MNZ
enquibiré/MNZ
enrederiré/MNZ
enrigidiré/MNZ
enrobustiré/MNZ
enronquiré/MNZ
ensalvatgiré/MNZ
ensenyoriré/MNZ
ensordiré/MNZ
ensuperbiré/MNZ
ensutziré/MNZ
entemoniré/MNZ
entenebriré/MNZ
entorciré/MNZ
entreabaltiré/MNZ
entrelluiré/MNZ
entreseguiré/MNZ
entreteixiré/MNZ
entumiré/MNZ
envalentiré/MNZ
envelliré/MNZ
envermelliré/MNZ
envestiré/MNZ
envigoriré/MNZ
enviliré/MNZ
erigiré/MNZ
esbaldiré/MNZ
esbandiré/MNZ
esblanqueiré/MNZ
escandiré/MNZ
escapoliré/MNZ
escarpiré/MNZ
escindiré/MNZ
esclariré/MNZ
escondiré/MNZ
esculpiré/MNZ
esfereiré/MNZ
esllanguiré/MNZ
esmortiré/MNZ
espairé/MNZ
espargiré/MNZ
espessiré/MNZ
esporuguiré/MNZ
esquifiré/MNZ
estaborniré/MNZ
estampiré/MNZ
estergiré/MNZ
estremiré/MNZ
estufiré/MNZ
esvaniré/MNZ
exaudiré/MNZ
excel·liré/MNZ
exhauriré/MNZ
exigiré/MNZ
existiré/MNZ
expediré/MNZ
exprimiré/MNZ
extorquiré/MNZ
extrudiré/MNZ
farciré/MN
feriré/MN
finiré/MN
floriré/MN
forbiré/MN
fregiré/MN
fruiré/MN
fulgiré/MN
garantiré/MN
gaudiré/MN
glapiré/MN
grunyiré/M
guarniré/MN
immergiré/MNZ
impartiré/MNZ
impel·liré/MNZ
incidiré/MNZ
incumbiré/MNZ
inferiré/MNZ
influiré/MNZ
ingeriré/MNZ
inquiriré/MNZ
insistiré/MNZ
instruiré/MNZ
intercediré/MNZ
intervertiré/MNZ
intruiré/MNZ
invertiré/MNZ
jaquiré/MN
llanguiré/MN
lluiré/MN
malferiré/MN
malserviré/MN
marfondiré/MN
migpartiré/MN
moriré/M
muniré/MN
musteiré/MN
neuliré/MN
obeiré/MNZ
obsediré/MNZ
occiré/MNZ
oiré/MNZ
ordiré/MNZ
pansiré/MN
partiré/MN
pellpartiré/MN
perbulliré/M
periré/MN
perseguiré/MN
persuadiré/MN
podriré/MN
pol·luiré/MN
precediré/MN
preexistiré/MN
premoriré/M
prescindiré/MN
pressentiré/M
preteriré/MN
produiré/MN
prohibiré/MN
propendiré/MN
prostituiré/MN
proveiré/MN
punyiré/M
rapiré/MN
reassumiré/MN
rebordeiré/MN
rebotiré/MN
recenyiré/MN
recompliré/MN
reconduiré/MN
reconstituiré/MN
reconvertiré/MN
recosiré/M
redhibiré/MN
redistribuiré/MN
reelegiré/MN
reexpediré/MN
reflectiré/MN
refluiré/MN
refringiré/MN
regiré/MN
reincidiré/MN
reinvertiré/MN
relinquiré/MN
rellentiré/MN
remolliré/MN
rendiré/MN
repartiré/MN
repercutiré/MN
repodriré/MN
reprimiré/MN
requeriré/MN
resclosiré/MN
resistiré/MN
resseguiré/MN
ressorgiré/MN
restituiré/MN
resumiré/MN
retentiré/MN
retorquiré/MN
retribuiré/MN
retrunyiré/M
revelliré/MN
reverdiré/MN
revertiré/MN
rostiré/MN
salsiré/MN
sebolliré/MN
seguiré/MN
serviré/MN
sobreexcediré/MN
sobresortiré/M
sofregiré/MN
sorgiré/MN
subdistingiré/MN
submergiré/MN
subsistiré/MN
subtendiré/MN
succeiré/MN
suggeriré/MN
sumiré/MN
teixiré/MN
tendiré/MN
toliré/MN
trairé/MN
transferiré/MN
transigiré/MN
transvestiré/MN
tremiré/MN
ungiré/MNZ
urgiré/MNZ
usucapiré/MNZ
vigiré/MN
vogiré/MN
